Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3201
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-3201 to 48-3205 shall be known and may be cited as the Facilitating Business Rapid Response to State Declared Disasters Act.

Laws 2016, LB913, § 1.